Wyoming statutes. Title 29 Liens
Article 1. In General

§ 29-3-101.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Drilling” means open pit work, field processing, gasification, digging, shooting, torpedoing, perforating, fracturing, testing, logging, acidizing, cementing, completing or repairing;

“Material” means casing, tanks, pipelines, fuel, machinery, equipment, appliances, buildings, structures, tools, bits or supplies. “Material” does not include drilling rigs or hoists or their integral component parts except wire lines.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 101, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 29-28; W.S. 1977, §

29-3-102

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Cited

in

KM Upstream, LLC v. Elkhorn Constr., Inc., 2012 WY 79, 278 P.3d 711,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(June 6, 2012).

§ 29-3-102.
Nonimpairment of lien attached to estate less than fee or to equitable or legal contingent interest.

If a lien as provided by this chapter attaches to an estate less than the fee, forfeiture of the estate shall not impair any lien which attaches prior to forfeiture as to material, appurtenances and fixtures previously located on the estate.

If a lien provided in this chapter attaches to an equitable interest or to a legal interest contingent upon the happening of a condition subsequent, failure of the interest to ripen into legal title or failure of the condition subsequent shall not impair any lien as to material, appurtenances and fixtures located thereon to which the lien attached prior to the failure.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 101, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 29-27; W.S. 1977, §

29-3-101

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2.

Lien may attach to an estate less than the fee.

Cities Serv. Oil Co. v. Pubco Petroleum Corp., 497 P.2d 1368,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 257

(Wyo. 1972).

Applied

in

Oxley v. Mine & Smelter Supply Co., 439 P.2d 661,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1968).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Oil and gas farmout agreements, 65 ALR5th 211.

§ 29-3-103.
Extent of liens; generally.

Every person who works upon or furnishes material, whether incorporated into the real property or not, under contract with the owner of any interest in real estate or with an agent, trustee or receiver of an owner has a lien to secure payment for:

Constructing, altering, digging, drilling, driving, boring, operating, completing or repairing any wells, mines or quarries;

Altering, repairing or constructing any oil derrick, oil tank or any pipelines;

Transportation and related mileage charges plus interest from the date due;

Advertising, selling and preparing for sale;

Sheriff’s fees; and

Attorney’s fees and other costs of collection.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section and W.S. 29-3-105(a)(iii) through (ix):

If work is performed for or materials are furnished the owner of an estate less than a fee the lien granted by this chapter shall not extend to the underlying fee or royalty interest unless expressly provided by contract with the owner of the underlying fee or royalty interest;

If work is performed for or materials furnished to the owner, part owner or lessee of the working interest in only a portion of the acreage covered by a lease, the lien granted by this chapter shall be restricted to that portion of the acreage; and

If work is performed for, or materials furnished to the owners or an agent, trustee of [or] receiver of the owners of lands, leases or interests therein validly pooled or unitized by agreement of the owners thereof or by operation of law, the lien granted by this chapter shall extend to the lands, leases or interests so pooled or unitized.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 128, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 4830; R.S. 1931, § 66-604; C.S. 1945, § 55-401; Laws 1955, ch. 101, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 29-29; W.S. 1977, §

29-3-103

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

deleted “or” at the end of (a)(i).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Basic purpose of lien statutes,

which are in derogation of the common law, is to create a new means of securing claims of particular classes of creditors and to prevent unjust enrichment arising from enhancement of property from which work and materials expended thereon would otherwise go without payment. Permian Corp. v. Armco Steel Corp., 508 F.2d 68, 1974 U.S. App. LEXIS 5581 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1974).

Oil and gas lien laws, like other lien laws, are purely statutory.

Cities Serv. Oil Co. v. Pubco Petroleum Corp., 497 P.2d 1368,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 257

(Wyo. 1972).

They must be strictly construed,

and their scope cannot be extended by implication. Cities Serv. Oil Co. v. Pubco Petroleum Corp., 497 P.2d 1368,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 257

(Wyo. 1972).

The lien, if any, has to arise by statute

and not by a series of provisions in a contract wherein the lien claimant is not a party. Cities Serv. Oil Co. v. Pubco Petroleum Corp., 497 P.2d 1368,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 257

(Wyo. 1972).

No lien can be created without a contract with an owner or part owner,

either legal or equitable, upon the property upon which the lien is established. Cities Serv. Oil Co. v. Pubco Petroleum Corp., 497 P.2d 1368,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 257

(Wyo. 1972).

Subcontractor has no lien against leasehold unless contractor has an agreement with owner

that the owner will pay for the services asserted in the lien. Adobe Oil & Gas Corp. v. Getter Trucking, 676 P.2d 560,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 251

(Wyo. 1984).

Term “royalty interest” does not mean “landowner's royalty interest”;

that would add something to this section which is not there. Cities Serv. Oil Co. v. Pubco Petroleum Corp., 497 P.2d 1368,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 257

(Wyo. 1972).

Intent of legislature was to restrict lien in case of oil well to leasehold estate

of the party who contracts for the drilling. Cities Serv. Oil Co. v. Pubco Petroleum Corp., 497 P.2d 1368,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 257

(Wyo. 1972).

And lien does not extend to fee or royalty interest absent express contract provision. —

The proviso expressly provides that a lien shall not extend to the underlying fee or royalty interest unless expressly provided by contract. Cities Serv. Oil Co. v. Pubco Petroleum Corp., 497 P.2d 1368,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 257

(Wyo. 1972).

Overriding royalty not subject to lien. —

The term “overriding royalty” is defined as an interest in oil and gas production at the surface, free of the expense of production, and in addition to the usual landowner's royalty reserved to the lessor in an oil and gas lease. It is, first and foremost, a “royalty interest,” and the application of this section means a lien shall not extent to an overriding royalty interest. Cities Serv. Oil Co. v. Pubco Petroleum Corp., 497 P.2d 1368,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 257

(Wyo. 1972).

Mechanic's lien may arise by implication

from the relations and dealings of the parties whose interest are involved. Permian Corp. v. Armco Steel Corp., 508 F.2d 68, 1974 U.S. App. LEXIS 5581 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1974).

Similarity to equitable lien. —

The statutorily created mechanic's lien is akin to an “equitable lien,” which has been defined as a right, not existing at law, to have specific property applied, in whole or in part, to the payment of a particular class of debts which may be created by express contract which shows an intention to charge some particular property with a debt obligation. Permian Corp. v. Armco Steel Corp., 508 F.2d 68, 1974 U.S. App. LEXIS 5581 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1974).

Effect of previous entry of judgment in favor of lienholder. —

Where the holder of a mechanic's lien as a statutory lien creditor against a corporate debtor obtained a choate lien upon the proceeds of the debtor's share of the proceeds of production in the hands of a judgment creditor with writ of execution upon service of the statutory notice, the previous entry of judgment in favor of the mechanic lienholder on the lien claim did not deprive the holder of the priority benefit of the lien. Permian Corp. v. Armco Steel Corp., 508 F.2d 68, 1974 U.S. App. LEXIS 5581 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1974).

Lien for labor and materials furnished assignee of lease extends to oil, not land. —

A lien for labor and material furnished under a contract with the assignee of an oil and gas lease, together with its priority, extends to the oil, and the proceeds thereof, as distinguished from the land or leasehold. Pheister v. Ogden Smelting & Ref. Mills, 364 P.2d 1078,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1961).

But is superior to prior mortgage as to oil not in possession of mortgagee. —

Where the mortgagee made no effort of any kind whatever to take possession or control of oil produced on a leasehold, or the proceeds thereof, up to the time when plaintiff's lien for labor and material furnished under a contract with the assignee of an oil and gas lease became effective, the lien of the plaintiff must be held to be prior and superior to the claim of the mortgagee insofar as the oil and the proceeds thereof are concerned. The date of priority, however, must be held to relate back only to the time when the work and labor of the plaintiff was completed. Pheister v. Ogden Smelting & Ref. Mills, 364 P.2d 1078,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1961).

Relation back. —

Because a lien on production did not relate back to the time prior to the petition date under Wyoming law, a creditor’s postpetition actions did not fall within the scope and safeguards of the relation back exception; rather, these actions violated the automatic stay, as they would give rise to postpetition liens and cause interception of debtor receivables. Southland Royalty Co. LLC v. Halliburton Energy Servs. (In re Southland Royalty Co. LLC), 624 B.R. 331, 2021 Bankr. LEXIS 149 (Bankr. D. Del. 2021).

Resolution of a mechanic's lien claim did not make moot an oil and gas lien claim. —

Resolution of a mechanic's lien claim did not make moot an oil and gas lien claim because the two types of claims are very different, as shown by this section and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

29-3-105

.
KM Upstream, LLC v. Elkhorn Constr., Inc., 2012 WY 79, 278 P.3d 711,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 2012).

Contents of notice. —

Although in action to enforce lien, under this section, it is necessary to state that contract for labor or materials was made with owner, or someone acting under his authority, such statement is not necessary in notice of lien under §

29-3-108

(now see §

29-3-106

). Craig v. Higgins, 31 Wyo. 166, 224 P. 668,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo.), different results reached on reh'g, 32 Wyo. 58, 228 P. 802,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1924).

Limitations of lien. —

Where principal contractor furnished material to dig an oil well, for which leaseholder agreed to assign certain leases, persons furnishing materials to contractor were not entitled to lien, since § 29-3-113 (now see §

29-3-110

) limited owner's liability to consideration expressed in contract, and this section and §

29-3-104

provide that materialman's lien right is limited to that of original contractor. National Supply Company-Midwest v. Weaver, 35 Wyo. 224, 248 P. 353,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1926).

Attorneys' fees. —

This section clearly applies only to contract claims, and thus did not authorize plaintiff's recovery of attorneys' fees on its claim for unjust enrichment. Matheson Drilling, Inc. v. Padova, 5 P.3d 810,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 2000).

Cited

in

Champlin Petro. Co. v. Mingo Oil Producers, 628 F. Supp. 557, 1986 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 29948 (D. Wyo. 1986); Burg v. Ruby Drilling Co., 783 P.2d 144,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 230

(Wyo. 1989).

Law reviews. —

See note, “Oil and Gas Interests Subject to Wyoming Lien Laws,” 11 Wyo. L.J. 160.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Oil and gas farmout agreements, 65 ALR5th 211.

§ 29-3-104.
Extent of liens; persons furnishing material or work under contract.

Any person, who furnishes or rents any materials or provides any work under contract with any contractor or subcontractor shall have a lien on all the property on which the lien of the contractor may attach to the same extent as the contractor’s lien to secure payment.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 128, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 4831; R.S. 1931, § 66-605; C.S. 1945, § 55-402; Laws 1955, ch. 101, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 29-30; W.S. 1977, §

29-3-104

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2.

Property held subject to materialmen's liens after principal contractor paid in full. —

The oil and gas leasehold estate and well of the owner may be subject to materialmen's liens for amounts owing from the principal contractor to materialmen when the owner paid the principal contractor in full, pursuant to the drilling contract, after the well was completed prior to receiving notice from the materialmen that they had not been paid by the principal contractor. Arnold v. American Pipe & Supply Co., 413 P.2d 874,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 1966).

Subcontractor has no lien against leasehold unless contractor has an agreement with owner

that the owner will pay for the services asserted in the lien. Adobe Oil & Gas Corp. v. Getter Trucking, 676 P.2d 560,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 251

(Wyo. 1984).

Cited

in

National Supply Company-Midwest v. Weaver, 35 Wyo. 224, 248 P. 353,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(1926).

§ 29-3-105.
Extent of liens; on oil, or proceeds thereof; notice to purchaser required; effect of notice; purchaser to withhold payments.

The lien provided by this chapter covers:

All the production of oil, gas and ore and minerals in solid form attributable to the interest subject to the lien;

The proceeds of production attaching to the working interest as the working interest existed on the date labor was first performed or materials were first furnished;

Any well;

Oil derricks;

Oil tanks;

Any pipelines including rights-of-way;

Any mine or quarry;

All materials furnished for use with work done; and

The whole of the land or leasehold (or, in the case of validly pooled or unitized lands, leases or interests, the lands, leases or interests so pooled or unitized) and including all other wells, buildings, property and appurtenances, including water rights, located on the land or leasehold (or pooled or unitized lands, leases or interests) where work was performed or materials furnished.

Any lien claimed pursuant to this chapter covering oil, gas or ore and minerals in solid form or the proceeds of their sale is not effective against any purchaser of the oil, gas or ore and minerals in solid form until written notice of the claim is delivered by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the purchaser at his principal place of business. Notice shall state:

The name of the claimant;

His address;

The amount of the lien; and

The description of the interest on which the lien is claimed.

The production of any mineral interest or working interest otherwise subject to a lien under this chapter is not to be encumbered until notice of the lien is delivered as provided in subsection (b) of this section to the holder of the interest. At the time notice is given any proceeds remaining unpaid or any proceeds yet to be paid on future sales of the mineral production shall be encumbered by the lien.

A purchaser shall withhold payments for oil or gas runs or ore and minerals in solid form to the extent of the lien amount claimed until delivery of written notice the claim is settled or until otherwise ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 101, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 29-31; Laws 1959, ch. 4, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

29-3-105

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2.

Basic purpose of lien statutes,

which are in derogation of the common law, is to create a new means of securing claims of particular classes of creditors and to prevent unjust enrichment arising from enhancement of property from which work and materials expended thereon would otherwise go without payment. Permian Corp. v. Armco Steel Corp., 508 F.2d 68, 1974 U.S. App. LEXIS 5581 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1974).

Mechanic's lien may arise by implication

from the relations and dealings of the parties whose interests are involved. Permian Corp. v. Armco Steel Corp., 508 F.2d 68, 1974 U.S. App. LEXIS 5581 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1974).

Similarity to equitable lien. —

The statutorily created mechanic's lien is akin to an “equitable lien,” which has been defined as a right, not existing at law, to have specific property applied, in whole or in part, to the payment of a particular class of debts which may be created by express contract which shows an intention to charge some particular property with a debt obligation. Permian Corp. v. Armco Steel Corp., 508 F.2d 68, 1974 U.S. App. LEXIS 5581 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1974).

Effect of previous entry of judgment in favor of lienholder. —

Where the holder of a mechanic's lien as a statutory lien creditor against a corporate debtor obtained a choate lien upon the proceeds of the debtor's share of the proceeds of production in the hands of a judgment creditor with writ of execution upon service of the statutory notice, the previous entry of judgment in favor of the mechanic lienholder on the lien claim did not deprive the holder of the priority benefit of the lien. Permian Corp. v. Armco Steel Corp., 508 F.2d 68, 1974 U.S. App. LEXIS 5581 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1974).

Lien for labor and materials furnished assignee of lease extends to oil, not land. —

A lien for labor and material furnished under a contract with the assignee of an oil and gas lease, together with its priority, extends to the oil, and the proceeds thereof, as distinguished from the land or leasehold. Pheister v. Ogden Smelting & Ref. Mills, 364 P.2d 1078,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1961).

But is superior to prior mortgage as to oil not in possession of mortgagee. —

Where the mortgagee made no effort of any kind whatever to take possession or control of oil produced on a leasehold, or the proceeds thereof, up to the time when plaintiff's lien for labor and material furnished under a contract with the assignee of an oil and gas lease became effective, the lien of the plaintiff must be held to be prior and superior to the claim of the mortgagee insofar as the oil and the proceeds thereof are concerned. The date of priority, however, must be held to relate back only to the time when the work and labor of the plaintiff was completed. Pheister v. Ogden Smelting & Ref. Mills, 364 P.2d 1078,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1961).

Proper notice provided. —

Judgment was entered for a creditor on a trustee's claim under 11 U.S.C.S. § 544 to avoid the creditor's liens on oil and gas properties as unperfected because the trustee was bound by a judgment on the creditor's action to foreclose on the liens, which contained a finding that the creditor's liens were valid, and the creditor provided requisite notice of its asserted liens in the crude production proceeds under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 29-3-105(b).
Royal v. Sharkey Well Serv. (In re DCD, Inc.), 2006 Bankr. LEXIS 1455 (Bankr. D. Wyo. June 12, 2006).

Statutory oil and gas liens valid and perfected as of the dates liens were filed. —

Judgment was entered for a creditor on a trustee's preference claim under 11 U.S.C.S. § 547(b) because the creditor's statutory oil and gas liens were valid and perfected in the oil and gas properties as of the dates those liens were filed, and in the proceeds of production from the date notice was delivered to the purchaser of the debtor's crude oil production from the oil and gas properties subject to the creditor's lien statements under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 29-3-105(b). The recording of the creditor's judgment on an action under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 29-3-109(a) to foreclose the liens was irrelevant as to the date of the perfection of the liens and transfer date for purposes of 11 U.S.C.S. § 547.
Royal v. Sharkey Well Serv. (In re DCD, Inc.), 2006 Bankr. LEXIS 1455 (Bankr. D. Wyo. June 12, 2006).

Relation back. —

Because a lien on production did not relate back to the time prior to the petition date under Wyoming law, a creditor’s post-petition actions did not fall within the scope and safeguards of the relation back exception; rather, these actions violated the automatic stay, as they would give rise to post-petition liens and cause interception of debtor receivables. Southland Royalty Co. LLC v. Halliburton Energy Servs. (In re Southland Royalty Co. LLC), 624 B.R. 331, 2021 Bankr. LEXIS 149 (Bankr. D. Del. 2021).

Resolution of a mechanic's lien claim did not make moot an oil and gas lien claim. —

Resolution of a mechanic's lien claim did not make moot an oil and gas lien claim because the two types of claims are very different, as shown by Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 29-3-103(a)(vi) and this section.
KM Upstream, LLC v. Elkhorn Constr., Inc., 2012 WY 79, 278 P.3d 711,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 2012).

Cited

in

Burg v. Ruby Drilling Co., 783 P.2d 144,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 230

(Wyo. 1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Rights and liabilities with respect to natural gas reduced to possession and subsequently stored in natural reservoir, 94 ALR2d 543.

Assertion of statutory mechanic's or materialman's lien against oil and gas produced or against proceeds attributable to oil and gas sold, 59 ALR3d 278.

Oil and gas farmout agreements, 65 ALR5th 211.

§ 29-3-106.
Lien statement to be filed; $750 minimum; place and time of filing.

To perfect the lien provided by this chapter, a lien statement shall be filed with the county clerk and notice by certified mail shall be given by the lien claimant.

The lien statement may be filed and the lien shall attach and be enforced if any sum exceeding seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) for materials furnished or work performed according to this chapter is owing. The lien claimant may file a lien statement in the office of the county clerk in any county where any part of the land, leasehold, mine, quarry, pipeline or other property to which a lien may attach under this chapter is situated within one hundred eighty (180) days:

After the last day materials were delivered or work was performed under contract;

From the date the work was substantially completed as determined by the facts in each case; or

With respect to an employee or subcontractor, after the last day he performed work at the direction of his employer or contractor.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 128, § 4; C.S. 1920, § 4833; R.S. 1931, § 66-607; C.S. 1945, § 55-404; Laws 1955, ch. 101, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 29-34; W.S. 1977, §

29-3-108

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2; 1983, ch. 74, § 1; 2010, ch. 38, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “lien claimant” for “county clerk” at the end of (a).

Applied

in

Oxley v. Mine & Smelter Supply Co., 439 P.2d 661,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1968).

Cited

in

Craig v. Higgins, 31 Wyo. 166, 224 P. 668,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(1924).

§ 29-3-107.
Property not to be sold or removed after perfected lien attaches without lienholder's consent; lienholder's rights upon violation.

Property subject to a perfected lien shall not be sold or removed from the premises where it is located without the written consent of the holder of the lien and as may be appropriate by:

The owner of the land;

The owner of any associated oil, gas or mineral leasehold interest;

The owner of any oil, gas or water pipeline;

Any contractor or subcontractor;

The purchaser, trustee, receiver or agent of any owner;

Any lessor or lessee; or

Any agent of any contractor, subcontractor or purchaser.

If a violation of this section occurs, the lienholder is entitled to possession of the property against which a perfected lien has attached wherever located and is entitled to have the property sold for payment of the debt whether the debt is due or not.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 128, § 6; C.S. 1920, § 4835; R.S. 1931, § 66-609; C.S. 1945, § 55-406; W.S. 1957, § 29-35; W.S. 1977, §

29-3-109

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2.

Section does not deprive owner of right to possession prior to foreclosure.

Chittim v. Armco Steel Corp., 407 P.2d 1015,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 1965).

§ 29-3-108.
Fraudulent violation of section 29-3-107; penalty.

If any person removes any property covered by the lien created by this chapter from its location when the lien is filed and recorded without the written consent of the holder of the lien and with intent to defraud the lienholder, either originally or by transfer, the person removing or causing the property to be removed is guilty of a misdemeanor. On conviction he shall be punished by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00).

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 128, § 7; C.S. 1920, § 4836; R.S. 1931, § 66-610; C.S. 1945, § 55-407; W.S. 1957, § 29-36; W.S. 1977, §

29-3-110

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2.

§ 29-3-109.
Limitation of actions and duration of liens; procedure when property subject to lien removed to another county.

Every person holding a lien created by this chapter may proceed to obtain a judgment for the amount claimed by civil action commenced on the account within one hundred eighty (180) days after filing of the lien statement required by W.S.

29-3-106

. The lien shall continue until the case is finally determined.

If any person removes any property subject to a lien to a county other than the one in which the lien is filed, the lien claimant may within thirty (30) days thereafter file with the county clerk of the county to which it has been removed an itemized inventory of the property removed. The inventory shall show the amount due and unpaid on the lien. The inventory shall be recorded in the lien records of that county. The filing shall operate as a notice of the continuing existence of the lien. The lien shall attach and extend to the land or leasehold and other premises, properties and appurtenances to which the property removed is attached.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 128, § 5; C.S. 1920, § 4834; R.S. 1931, § 66-608; C.S. 1945, § 55-405; Laws 1951, ch. 35, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 29-37; W.S. 1977, §

29-3-111

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

Cross references. —

See also §

29-2-109

and cross references thereunder.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), substituted “lien statement” for “notice” and “29-3-106” for “29-3-108.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Basic purpose of lien statutes,

which are in derogation of the common law, is to create a new means of securing claims of particular classes of creditors and to prevent unjust enrichment arising from enhancement of property from which work and materials expended thereon would otherwise go without payment. Permian Corp. v. Armco Steel Corp., 508 F.2d 68, 1974 U.S. App. LEXIS 5581 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1974).

Mechanic's lien may arise by implication

from the relations and dealings of the parties whose interests are involved. Permian Corp. v. Armco Steel Corp., 508 F.2d 68, 1974 U.S. App. LEXIS 5581 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1974).

Similarity to equitable lien. —

The statutorily created mechanic's lien is akin to an “equitable lien,” which has been defined as a right, not existing at law, to have specific property applied, in whole or in part, to the payment of a particular class of debts which may be created by express contract which shows an intention to charge some particular property with a debt obligation. Permian Corp. v. Armco Steel Corp., 508 F.2d 68, 1974 U.S. App. LEXIS 5581 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1974).

Choate lien. —

The mechanic's lien of a materialman is a “choate” lien following service of notice. Permian Corp. v. Armco Steel Corp., 508 F.2d 68, 1974 U.S. App. LEXIS 5581 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1974).

Effect of previous entry of judgment in favor of lienholder. —

Where the holder of a mechanic's lien as a statutory lien creditor against a corporate debtor obtained a choate lien upon the proceeds of the debtor's share of the proceeds of production in the hands of a judgment creditor with writ of execution upon service of the statutory notice, the previous entry of judgment in favor of the mechanic's lienholder on the lien claim did not deprive the holder of the priority benefit of the lien. Permian Corp. v. Armco Steel Corp., 508 F.2d 68, 1974 U.S. App. LEXIS 5581 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1974).

§ 29-3-110.
Limitation upon owner's liability and rights.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to fix a greater liability against the owner of the land or leasehold (or pooled or unitized lands, leases or interests, as the case may be) than the price or sum stipulated by the owner to be paid for the materials or services furnished or labor performed. The owner shall not have the right to offset obligations of the contractor unless these obligations arise out of the original contract.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 128, § 9; C.S. 1920, § 4838; R.S. 1931, § 66-612; C.S. 1945, § 55-409; Laws 1955, ch. 101, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 29-39; W.S. 1977, § 29-3-113; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “chapter” for “act.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Severability. —

Section 10, ch. 128, Laws 1919, provided that if any of the provisions thereof should be held invalid or unenforceable the remainder of the act should not be affected thereby.

Property held subject to materialmen's liens after principal contractor paid in full. —

The oil and gas leasehold estate and well of the owner may be subject to materialmen's liens for amounts owing from the principal contractor to materialmen when the owner paid the principal contractor in full, pursuant to the drilling contract, after the well was completed prior to receiving notice from the materialmen that they had not been paid by the principal contractor. Arnold v. American Pipe & Supply Co., 413 P.2d 874,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 1966).

Subcontractor has no lien against leasehold unless contractor has an agreement with owner

that the owner will pay for the services asserted in the lien. Adobe Oil & Gas Corp. v. Getter Trucking, 676 P.2d 560,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 251

(Wyo. 1984).

Cited

in

National Supply Company-Midwest v. Weaver, 35 Wyo. 224, 248 P. 353,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(1926); Burg v. Ruby Drilling Co., 783 P.2d 144,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 230

(Wyo. 1989).

§ 29-3-111.
Claim against contractor submitted to owner; reduction of subsequent payments to contractor by owner; duty of owner to notify contractor and of contractor to dispute or adjust claim.

Every person performing any work or furnishing any material, as specified in this chapter, under contract whose demand to be reimbursed for the work done or material furnished has not been paid shall serve the owner by certified mail return receipt requested, with an account signed before a notarial officer of the amount and value of the work performed or the material furnished remaining unpaid. Thereafter the owner or his agent shall retain out of any subsequent payments to the contractors the value of the work performed or material furnished for the person making the claim.

When notice is served on the owner according to subsection (a) of this section he shall immediately furnish the contractor with a copy of the notice.

Within ten (10) days of receipt of the notice required by this section the contractor shall give the owner affirmative written notice of:

His intent to dispute the claim; or

His intent the claim should be settled as filed.

If within ten (10) days after receiving notice the contractor takes no action he shall be presumed to have agreed to the validity of the claim. The owner is then authorized to withhold enough of all subsequent payments to be made to the contractor to pay all claims as they come due.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 77, Part V, §§ 2, 3; R.S. 1887, §§ 1494, 1495; R.S. 1899, §§ 2876, 2877; C.S. 1910, §§ 3786, 3787; C.S. 1920, §§ 4846, 4847; R.S. 1931, §§ 66-619, 66-620; C.S. 1945, §§ 55-311, 55-312; W.S. 1957, §§ 29-50, 29-51; W.S. 1977,§§ 29-3-221, 29-3-222; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2; 2008, ch. 20, § 2.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “notarial officer” for “notary public” in the first sentence of (a).

Property held subject to materialmen's liens after principal contractor paid in full. —

The oil and gas leasehold estate and well of the owner may be subject to materialmen's liens for amounts owing from the principal contractor to materialmen when the owner paid the principal contractor in full, pursuant to the drilling contract, after the well was completed prior to receiving notice from the materialmen that they had not been paid by the principal contractor. Arnold v. American Pipe & Supply Co., 413 P.2d 874,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 1966).

Cited

in

Adobe Oil & Gas Corp. v. Getter Trucking, Inc., 676 P.2d 560,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 251

(Wyo. 1984).